Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1401SV (1) 91 dg/ko S.F. 385 Section 1. Section 135C.40, subsection 1, paragraph d, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) The department shall establish and maintain a 3 process to review each deficient practice identified by the 4 department for which a citation may be issued to a nursing 5 facility for immediate jeopardy or substandard quality of care 6 prior to issuance of final findings under section 135C.40A . 7 Representatives of the nursing facility issued such a citation 8 may participate in the review to provide context and or 9 evidence for the department to consider in determining if a 10 final finding of immediate jeopardy or substandard quality of 11 care should be issued. The review shall ensure consistent and 12 accurate application of federal and state inspection protocols 13 and defined regulatory standards. 14